Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.42.040

Withdrawal of life support systems.

RCW 9A.42.020, 9A.42.030, 9A.42.035, and 9A.42.037 do not apply to decisions to withdraw life support systems made in accordance with chapter 7.70 or 70.122 RCW by the dependent person, his or her legal surrogate, or others with a legal duty to care for the dependent person.

[ 2002 c 219 s 3; 2000 c 76 s 2; 1986 c 250 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.